North Dakota, session 69, HB1244.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 57-38 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Home education income tax credit for qualified educational expenses.
1. A taxpayer is allowed a credit against the tax imposed under section 57 - 38 - 30.3 in the
amount of qualified educational expenses paid by the taxpayer for each qualifying
child during the taxable year.
2. The amount of the credit under this section is limited to one thousand dollars per
qualifying child per taxable year. In the case of a married individual filing a separate
return, the credit under this section is limited to five hundred dollars per qualifying child
per taxable year.
3. For purposes of this section:
a. "Dependent" has the same meaning it has for federal income tax purposes.
b. "Qualified educational expenses" means the amount expended for each
qualifying child for items used directly for home education of the qualifying child,
including books, tuition, supplementary materials, computers or similar electronic
devices, accessories for computers or similar electronic devices, and computer
software, applications, or subscriptions.
Page No. 1 25.0405.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
c. "Qualifying child" means a student who is a dependent of the taxpayer, received
home education under chapter 15.1 - 23 during the taxable year, and was under
the age of nineteen at the end of the taxable year.
4. The credit under this section may not exceed the taxpayer's liability as determined
under this chapter for the taxable year.
5. To receive the tax credit provided under this section, a taxpayer shall claim the credit
in the form and manner prescribed by the tax commissioner.
SECTION 2. A new subdivision to subsection 7 of section 57-38-30.3 of the North Dakota
Century Code is created and enacted as follows:
Home education income tax credit for qualified educational expenses under
section 1 of this Act .
SECTION 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act is effective for taxable years beginning after
December 31, 2024.
Page No. 2 25.0405.03000